Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Chapter 3. Commander in Chief, Military Department, and Governor’s Staff

§ 33-3-1.
Commander in Chief.

The Governor shall be Commander in Chief of the militia and each of the classes thereof, except when it is called into the service of the United States, and shall have power to call forth the militia to execute the laws, repel invasion, and to suppress riots and insurrections, and to perform such other functions as may be authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-11; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 2, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-3-3.
Military department.

There shall be in the executive branch of the state government a military department. The Adjutant General shall be the executive head of the department and, as such, subordinate only to the Governor in matters pertaining thereto. There shall be in such department at least one (1) Assistant Adjutant General for Army, at least one (1) Assistant Adjutant General for Air, such other Assistant Adjutants General as may be authorized by rules and regulations of the National Guard Bureau of the United States of America, and such other officers, enlisted men and civilian employees as the Adjutant General shall, from time to time, determine.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-12; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 314, eff from and after passage (approved April 4, 1984).

§ 33-3-5.
Division of military staff.

The military staff of the Governor shall be divided into two kinds: the personal staff of the Governor and the military staff of the military department. The Governor may detail from the active list not more than ten National Guard officers, who, in addition to their regular duties, shall perform the duties of aides de camp on the personal staff of the Governor. In addition thereto the Governor may appoint such aides from the citizenship of this state as he shall choose, such appointees from the citizenship of the state to bear the honorary title of colonel and to have the right to wear such uniform as may be prescribed by the Governor, but who shall not by virtue of such appointment be deemed a part of the Mississippi National Guard and who shall not by virtue of such appointment participate directly or indirectly in the appropriations made by this state or by the United States for the support of the military department. The appointment of all aides shall terminate upon the expiration of the term of office of the Governor upon whose staff they may be serving.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-14; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 4, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-3-7.
Adjutant General.

The Governor shall nominate and, by and with the consent of the Senate, appoint and commission an Adjutant General, which appointment shall carry with it the rank of major general; provided, however, that if the person nominated is a retired officer who has attained a rank higher than that of major general he may, at the discretion of the Governor, retain such rank but his compensation shall not be increased above that amount hereinafter provided. The four-year term of the Adjutant General shall expire with the expiration of the appointing Governor’s term of office. The Adjutant General shall be chief of staff to the Governor, subordinate only to the Governor in matters affecting the military department and militia of this state.

To be eligible for such appointment, the Adjutant General shall have attained at least the rank of colonel, shall be eligible to receive federal recognition upon his appointment, and shall have served at least seven (7) years in the Armed Forces of the United States, either in active federal service or as a member of a reserve component, with at least three (3) years of such service in the Mississippi National Guard. At least five (5) years of such service shall have been as a commissioned officer.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-14; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 5; Laws, 1972, ch. 422, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1975, ch. 349; Laws, 1976, ch. 323; Laws, 1984, ch. 316; Laws, 1993, ch. 380, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 431, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 17, 1994).

§ 33-3-9.
Assistant adjutants general.

The Governor, on recommendation of the Adjutant General, shall appoint at least one (1) Assistant Adjutant General for Army and at least one (1) Assistant Adjutant General for air and such other assistant adjutants general as may be authorized by rules and regulations of the National Guard Bureau of the United States of America. Each shall have the rank of Brigadier General, or higher, if authorized by the National Guard Bureau of the United States of America. Each shall remain in office during the pleasure of the Governor, and shall be entitled to all the rights, privileges and immunities granted officers of like rank in the Mississippi National Guard. Each shall, before entering upon the duties of their office, take and subscribe to the oath of office prescribed for officers of the Mississippi National Guard, which oaths shall be deposited in the office of the Adjutant General. Each shall aid the Adjutant General by the performance of such duties as may be assigned him. In the case of death, absence or inability of the Adjutant General to act, the senior full-time Assistant Adjutant General shall perform the duties of the Adjutant General until the Adjutant General shall resume his duties or until a successor shall be appointed. To be qualified for appointment as Assistant Adjutant General, a person must at the time of his appointment possess the same qualifications required of the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-15; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 6; Laws, 1983, ch. 426; Laws, 1989, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1996, ch. 359, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1996.

§ 33-3-11.
General powers and duties of Adjutant General.

The Adjutant General shall:

Appoint all of the employees of his department and he may remove any of them at his discretion;

Keep rosters of all active, reserve and retired members of the militia of this state, and keep in his office all records and papers required to be kept and filed therein;

Submit to the Governor in each year preceding a regular session of the Legislature a printed detailed report of the transactions of his office, the expenses thereof, and such operations and conditions of the National Guard of this state as may be required by the Governor;

Cause the military law, the regulations of the National Guard of this state and such other military publications as may be necessary for the military service to be distributed at the expense of the state to commands so that all personnel of the National Guard of this state will have access to same;

Keep records on and preserve all military property belonging to the state;

Keep just and true accounts of all monies received and disbursed by him;

Attest all commissions and warrants issued to military officers of this state;

Have a seal;

Make such regulations pertaining to the preparations of reports and returns and to the care and preservation of property in possession of the state for military purposes, whether belonging to the state or the United States, as in his opinion the conditions demand;

Attend the care, preservation, safekeeping, transportation and repairing of the arms, ordnance, accouterments, equipment and all other military property belonging to the state or issued to the state by the government of the United States for military purposes, and keep accurate accounts thereof;

Issue such military property as the necessity of the services require and make purchases for that purpose.No military property shall be issued or loaned, except upon an emergency, to persons or organizations other than those belonging to the National Guard of Mississippi except to such portions of the unorganized militia as may be called out by the Governor;

Keep the reports and returns of troops and all other writings and documents required to be preserved by the state military headquarters;

Keep necessary records attesting to the service of individuals of Mississippi forces for the Spanish American War and all subsequent wars and insurrections.The Adjutant General is authorized to make a determination as to when old records have only historical value, and therefore, transfer them to the State Department of Archives and History for reference and preservation;

Those records and relics not required for efficient operation of the military department may be turned over to the Department of Archives and History for preservation;

The Adjutant General with the approval of the Governor shall provide for and be responsible for the organization, training, tactical employment, and discipline of the Mississippi National Guard, Mississippi State Guard, and the unorganized militia when called to active state duty.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-16; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 7; Laws, 2005, 2nd Ex Sess, ch. 6, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 14, 2005).

§ 33-3-13.
Seal; form and effect thereof.

The device upon the seal of the Adjutant General shall consist of the coat of arms of the State of Mississippi, and the words “Office of Adjutant General, State of Mississippi,” around the margin.

The seal used in the office of the Adjutant General shall be the seal of his office and shall be delivered by him to his successor. Where deemed appropriate orders issued from his office shall be authenticated with such seal and copies, orders, records and papers in his office, duly certified and authenticated under such seal, shall be evidence in all cases in like manner as if the originals were produced.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-17; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 8, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-3-15.
Rules and regulations.

The intent of this code is to conform to all acts and regulations of the United States affecting the same subjects, and all provisions of this code shall be construed to effect this purpose. All acts of the Congress of the United States relating to the control, administration and government of the National Guard, and all rules and regulations adopted by the United States for the government of the National Guard, so far as the same are not inconsistent with the laws of this state and with the rights reserved to this state and guaranteed under the constitution of this state, shall constitute rules and regulations for the government of the militia of this state.

The Adjutant General, with the approval of the Governor, shall have the power, and it shall be his duty from time to time to issue such orders and to prescribe such rules and regulations relating to the organization of the militia or to the National Guard or to the Mississippi State Guard as may be necessary for the proper training and discipline thereof; provided that such orders, rules and regulations are not in conflict with the laws of this state. The Adjutant General, with the approval of the Governor, is expressly authorized to issue such orders, rules and regulations as may be necessary in order that the organization, training and discipline of the components of the militia of this state will at all times conform to the applicable requirements of the United States government relating thereto. Orders, rules and regulations issued hereunder shall have full force and effect as part of the military code of this state. Rules and regulations in force at the time of the passage of this code shall remain in force until new rules and regulations are approved and promulgated.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-18; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 9, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-3-17.
Awards, medals and decorations.

The Governor is hereby authorized and empowered to decorate members and former members of the Mississippi National Guard and members and former members of the National Guard of the several states and members and former members of the Armed Forces of the United States, who he may deem worthy of such decoration, with such awards, medals or decorations as he may prescribe by rules and regulations promulgated by him, and the Governor is hereby authorized to promulgate suitable and reasonable rules and regulations for such purposes.

The Governor shall award posthumously the Mississippi Medal of Valor to those members of the Mississippi National Guard who gave their lives while in active service of the United States as defined in Section 33-1-1(l).

The Governor may award retroactively the Mississippi Medal of Valor to a member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States if such member has been awarded the Medal of Honor or the Purple Heart.

The design of the Mississippi Medal of Valor is as follows: A gold medal with the Great Seal of the State of Mississippi superimposed on a cross combined with crossed sabers with the words “MEDAL OF VALOR” inscribed around the seal. The medal is suspended from a ribbon of navy blue background, with two (2) wide, vertical white bands. The recipient’s name and rank are engraved in the reverse side of the medal. The ribbon carries the same colors as described for the medal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8519-19; Laws, 1966, ch. 539, § 10; Laws, 2004, ch. 545, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2004.